North Carolina, session 2025, HB584.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. ELIMINATE DRIVING ELIGIBILITY CERTIFICATE AND DRIVING LOG
REQUIREMENTS FOR THE ISSUANCE OF LEARNER'S PERMITS AND
PROVISIONAL DRIVERS LICENSES
SECTION 1. G.S. 20-11 reads as rewritten:
"§ 20-11. Issuance of limited learner's permit and provisional drivers license to person who
is less than 18 years old.
…
(b) Level 1. – A person who is at least 15 years old but less than 18 years old may obtain
a limited learner's permit if the person meets all of the following requirements:
…
(3) Has a driving eligibility certificate or a high school diploma or its equivalent.
…
(d) Level 2. – A person who is at least 16 years old but less than 18 years old may obtain
a limited provisional license if the person meets all of the following requirements:
…
(4) Has a driving eligibility certificate or a high school diploma or its equivalent.
(5) Has completed a driving log, on a form approved by the Division, detailing a
minimum of 60 hours as the operator of a motor vehicle of a class for which
the driver has been issued a limited learner's permit. The log must show at
least 10 hours of the required driving occurred during nighttime hours. No
more than 10 hours of driving per week may be counted toward the 60-hour
requirement. The driving log must be signed by the supervising driver and
submitted to the Division at the time the applicant seeks to obtain a limited
provisional license. If the Division has cause to believe that a driving log has
been falsified, the limited learner's permit holder shall be required to complete
*H584-v-2*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
a new driving log with the same requirements and shall not be eligible to
obtain a limited provisional license for six months.
…
(f) Level 3. – A person who is at least 16 years old but less than 18 years old may obtain
a full provisional license if the person meets all of the following requirements:
…
(3) Has a driving eligibility certificate or a high school diploma or its equivalent.
(4) Has completed a driving log, on a form approved by the Division, detailing a
minimum of 12 hours as the operator of a motor vehicle of a class for which
the driver is licensed. The log must show at least six hours of the required
driving occurred during nighttime hours. The driving log must be signed by
the supervising driver for any hours driven outside the provisions of
subdivision (e)(2) of this section and submitted to the Division at the time the
applicant seeks to obtain a full provisional license. If the Division has cause
to believe that a driving log has been falsified, the limited provisional licensee
shall be required to complete a new driving log with the same requirements
and shall not be eligible to obtain a full provisional license for six months.
…
(h) Exception for Persons 16 to 18 Who Have an Unrestricted Out-of-State License. – A
person who is at least 16 years old but less than 18 years old, who was a resident of another state
and has an unrestricted drivers license issued by that state, and who becomes a resident of this
State may obtain one of the following upon the submission of a driving eligibility certificate or
a high school diploma or its equivalent:following:
…
(n) Driving Eligibility Certificate. – A person who desires to obtain a permit or license
issued under this section must have a high school diploma or its equivalent or must have a driving
eligibility certificate. A driving eligibility certificate must meet the following conditions:
(1) The person who is required to sign the certificate under subdivision (4) of this
subsection must show that he or she has determined that one of the following
requirements is met:
a. The person is currently enrolled in school and is making progress
toward obtaining a high school diploma or its equivalent.
b. A substantial hardship would be placed on the person or the person's
family if the person does not receive a certificate.
c. The person cannot make progress toward obtaining a high school
diploma or its equivalent.
(1a) The person who is required to sign the certificate under subdivision (4) of this
subsection also must show that one of the following requirements is met:
a. The person who seeks a permit or license issued under this section is
not subject to subsection (n1) of this section.
b. The person who seeks a permit or license issued under this section is
subject to subsection (n1) of this section and is eligible for the
certificate under that subsection.
(2) It must be on a form approved by the Division.
(3) It must be dated within 30 days of the date the person applies for a permit or
license issuable under this section.
(4) It must be signed by the applicable person named below:
a. The principal, or the principal's designee, of the public school in which
the person is enrolled.
b. The administrator, or the administrator's designee, of the nonpublic
school in which the person is enrolled.
Page 2 House Bill 584-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
c. The person who provides the academic instruction in the home school
in which the person is enrolled.
c1. The person who provides the academic instruction in the home in
accordance with an educational program found by a court, prior to July
1, 1998, to comply with the compulsory attendance law.
d. The designee of the board of directors of the charter school in which
the person is enrolled.
e. The president, or the president's designee, of the community college
in which the person is enrolled.
Notwithstanding any other law, the decision concerning whether a driving eligibility
certificate was properly issued or improperly denied shall be appealed only as provided under
the rules adopted in accordance with G.S. 115C-12(28), 115D-5(a3), or 115C-566, whichever is
applicable, and may not be appealed under this Chapter.
(n1) Lose Control; Lose License.
(1) The following definitions apply in this subsection:
a. Applicable State entity. – The State Board of Education for public
schools and charter schools, the State Board of Community Colleges
for community colleges, or the Secretary of Administration for
nonpublic schools and home schools.
b. Certificate. – A driving eligibility certificate that meets the conditions
of subsection (n) of this section.
c. Disciplinary action. – An expulsion, a suspension for more than 10
consecutive days, or an assignment to an alternative educational
setting for more than 10 consecutive days.
d. Enumerated student conduct. – One of the following behaviors that
results in disciplinary action:
1. The possession or sale of an alcoholic beverage or an illegal
controlled substance on school property.
2. The bringing, possession, or use on school property of a
weapon or firearm that resulted in disciplinary action under
G.S. 115C-390.10 or that could have resulted in that
disciplinary action if the conduct had occurred in a public
school.
3. The physical assault on a teacher or other school personnel on
school property.
e. School. – A public school, charter school, community college,
nonpublic school, or home school.
f. School administrator. – The person who is required to sign certificates
under subdivision (4) of subsection (n) of this section.
g. School property. – The physical premises of the school, school buses
or other vehicles under the school's control or contract and that are
used to transport students, and school-sponsored curricular or
extracurricular activities that occur on or off the physical premises of
the school.
h. Student. – A person who desires to obtain a permit or license issued
under this section.
(2) Any student who was subject to disciplinary action for enumerated student
conduct that occurred either after the first day of July before the school year
in which the student enrolled in the eighth grade or after the student's
fourteenth birthday, whichever event occurred first, is subject to this
subsection.
House Bill 584-Second Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) A student who is subject to this subsection is eligible for a certificate when
the school administrator determines that the student has exhausted all
administrative appeals connected to the disciplinary action and that one of the
following conditions is met:
a. The enumerated student conduct occurred before the student reached
the age of 15, and the student is now at least 16 years old.
b. The enumerated student conduct occurred after the student reached the
age of 15, and it is at least one year after the date the student exhausted
all administrative appeals connected to the disciplinary action.
c. The student needs the certificate in order to drive to and from school,
a drug or alcohol treatment counseling program, as appropriate, or a
mental health treatment program, and no other transportation is
available.
(4) A student whose permit or license is denied or revoked due to ineligibility for
a certificate under this subsection may otherwise be eligible for a certificate
if, after six months from the date of the ineligibility, the school administrator
determines that one of the following conditions is met:
a. The student has returned to school or has been placed in an alternative
educational setting, and has displayed exemplary student behavior, as
defined by the applicable State entity.
b. The disciplinary action was for the possession or sale of an alcoholic
beverage or an illegal controlled substance on school property, and the
student subsequently attended and successfully completed, as defined
by the applicable State entity, a drug or alcohol treatment counseling
program, as appropriate."

PART II. AUTHORIZE ONLINE APPLICATION TO OBTAIN A FULL PROVISIONAL
DRIVERS LICENSE
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 20-11(f) reads as rewritten:
"(f) Level 3. – A person who is at least 16 years old but less than 18 years old may obtain
a full provisional license if the person meets all of the following requirements:
(1) Has held a limited provisional license issued by the Division for at least six
months.
(2) Has not been convicted of a motor vehicle moving violation or seat belt
infraction or a violation of G.S. 20-137.3 during the preceding six months.
(3) Has a driving eligibility certificate or a high school diploma or its equivalent.
(4) Has completed a driving log, on a form approved by the Division, detailing a
minimum of 12 hours as the operator of a motor vehicle of a class for which
the driver is licensed. The log must show at least six hours of the required
driving occurred during nighttime hours. The driving log must be signed by
the supervising driver for any hours driven outside the provisions of
subdivision (e)(2) of this section and submitted to the Division at the time the
applicant seeks to obtain a full provisional license. If the Division has cause
to believe that a driving log has been falsified, the limited provisional licensee
shall be required to complete a new driving log with the same requirements
and shall not be eligible to obtain a full provisional license for six months.
A person who meets these requirements may obtain a full provisional license by applying online
or by mail."
SECTION 2.(b) The Division of Motor Vehicles shall develop a process by which
an applicant for a Level 3 full provisional license may submit any documentation required to
establish eligibility to obtain the license, electronically or by mail, without having to appear in
Page 4 House Bill 584-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
person at a drivers license office. The Division shall issue a Level 3 full provisional license to an
applicant who meets the statutory requirements and provides required documentation
electronically or by mail.

PART III. CONFORMING CHANGES
SECTION 3.(a) The following statutes are repealed:
(1) G.S. 20-9(b1).
(2) G.S. 20-13.2(c1).
(3) G.S. 115C-12(28).
(4) G.S. 115C-218.70.
(5) G.S. 115C-238.66(8).
(6) G.S. 115C-288(k).
(7) G.S. 115C-566.
(8) G.S. 115D-5(a3).
SECTION 3.(b) G.S. 115C-150.12C reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-150.12C. Powers and duties.
A board of trustees shall adopt rules necessary for the administration of the school to
implement the requirements of this Article. Each board of trustees shall have the following
powers and duties:
…
(19) Driving eligibility certificates and drivers Drivers education. – The board of
trustees shall apply the rules and policies established by the State Board of
Education for issuance of driving eligibility certificates. The board of trustees
shall provide drivers education in accordance with Article 14 of this Chapter.
…."

PART IV. TEMPORARILY REDUCE THE MINIMUM TIME PERIOD REQUIRED
FOR HOLDING A LIMITED LEARNER'S PERMIT
SECTION 4. G.S. 20-11(d) reads as rewritten:
"(d) Level 2. – A person who is at least 16 years old but less than 18 years old may obtain
a limited provisional license if the person meets all of the following requirements:
(1) Has held a limited learner's permit issued by the Division for at least nine six
months.
…."

PART V. EXTEND THE AMOUNT OF TIME A NEW RESIDENT HAS TO OBTAIN A
LICENSE IN NORTH CAROLINA
SECTION 5. G.S. 20-7(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) License Required. – To drive a motor vehicle on a highway, a person must be licensed
by the Division under this Article or Article 2C of this Chapter to drive the vehicle and must
carry the license while driving the vehicle. The Division issues regular drivers licenses under this
Article and issues commercial drivers licenses under Article 2C.
A license authorizes the holder of the license to drive any vehicle included in the class of the
license and any vehicle included in a lesser class of license, except a vehicle for which an
endorsement is required. To drive a vehicle for which an endorsement is required, a person must
obtain both a license and an endorsement for the vehicle. A regular drivers license is considered
a lesser class of license than its commercial counterpart.
The classes of regular drivers licenses and the motor vehicles that can be driven with each
class of license are:
(1) Class A. – A Class A license authorizes the holder to drive any of the
following:
House Bill 584-Second Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
a. A Class A motor vehicle that is exempt under G.S. 20-37.16 from the
commercial drivers license requirements.
b. A Class A motor vehicle that has a combined GVWR of less than
26,001 pounds and includes as part of the combination a towed unit
that has a GVWR of at least 10,001 pounds.
(2) Class B. – A Class B license authorizes the holder to drive any Class B motor
vehicle that is exempt under G.S. 20-37.16 from the commercial drivers
license requirements.
(3) Class C. – A Class C license authorizes the holder to drive any of the
following:
a. A Class C motor vehicle that is not a commercial motor vehicle.
b. When operated by a volunteer member of a fire department, a rescue
squad, or an emergency medical service (EMS) in the performance of
duty, a Class A or Class B fire-fighting, rescue, or EMS motor vehicle
or a combination of these vehicles.
c. A combination of noncommercial motor vehicles that have a GVWR
of more than 10,000 pounds but less than 26,001 pounds. This
sub-subdivision does not apply to a Class C license holder less than 18
years of age.
The Commissioner may assign a unique motor vehicle to a class that is different from the
class in which it would otherwise belong.
A person holding a commercial drivers license issued by another jurisdiction must apply for
a transfer and obtain a North Carolina issued commercial drivers license within 30 days of
becoming a resident. Any other new resident of North Carolina who has a drivers license issued
by another jurisdiction must obtain a license from the Division within 60 days six months after
becoming a resident. The Division shall waive the vision exam for a drivers license applicant
with a license issued by another jurisdiction if the license was issued within 12 months of the
application date. The Division shall allow the applicant to submit any documentation required by
the Division electronically, by mail, or in person."

PART VI. DIVISION OF MOTOR VEHICLES TO MAKE EFFORTS TO IMPROVE
EFFICIENCY FOR DRIVERS LICENSE APPLICANTS
SECTION 6. The Division of Motor Vehicles shall make a good-faith effort to
prioritize new resident drivers license applicants, commercial drivers license applicants, and
first-time drivers license applicants in providing appointment availability. The Division shall also
clearly outline on the Division's website the services that are available to customers online or by
other means that do not require an in-person office visit.

PART VII. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 7. Parts I through III of this act become effective October 1, 2025, and
apply to limited learner's permit or provisional license applications submitted on or after that
date. Part IV of this act is effective when it becomes law and applies to limited provisional license
applications submitted on or after that date. Part IV of this act expires on December 31, 2025.
Part V of this act becomes effective October 1, 2025. The remainder of this act is effective when
it becomes law.
Page 6 House Bill 584-Second Edition